Wisconsin, session 2025, SB338.
do enact as follows:SB338,11Section 1. 5.061 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB338,3,425.061 (3) A complainant under sub. (1) or any of the complainants in a 3consolidated complaint under sub. (2) may request a hearing and the matter shall 4then be treated as a contested case under ch. 227, except that the commission shall 5make a final determination with respect to the merits of the complaint and issue a 6decision within 89 days of the time that the complaint or the earliest of any 7complaints was filed, unless the complainant, or each of any complainants whose 8complaints are consolidated, consents to a specified longer period as provided under 9sub. (5). A hearing under this subsection shall be held in open session and the oral 1proceedings of the hearing shall be recorded by stenographic or electronic means. 2Hearing records shall be available for public inspection, as provided under s. 5.05 3(5s) (a). The commission shall also make a transcript of oral proceedings available 4for public inspection.SB338,25Section 2. 5.061 (5) of the statutes is created to read:SB338,3,1865.061 (5) The commission shall examine and investigate all complaints 7received under this section in a uniform and nondiscriminatory manner, as 8required under Title III of P.L. 107-252. The commission shall transmit to the 9complainant and all known interested parties an acknowledgment of receipt of the 10complaint within 5 business days from the date of its receipt. The commission shall 11make a final determination with respect to the merits of the complaint and issue a 12decision no later than 89 days following the date on which the complaint was filed, 13or following the date on which the earliest of the complaints consolidated under sub. 14(3) were filed, unless the complainant or each of the complainants whose complaints 15are consolidated, consents to a specified longer period. If a complainant requests a 16hearing, as provided under sub. (3), the commission shall conduct the hearing no 17later than 30 days after receiving the complaint or after receiving the earliest of the 18complaints consolidated under sub. (3).SB338,319Section 3. 5.061 (6) of the statutes is created to read:SB338,4,2205.061 (6) If the commission receives a complaint under sub. (1) that alleges 21that the commission itself is violating Title III of P.L. 107-252, or that such a 22violation is likely to occur as a result of action or inaction by the commission, the 23commission shall make a final determination with respect to the merits of the 1complaint and issue a decision. The commission may not dismiss the complaint 2simply because the complaint alleges a violation by the commission.SB338,43Section 4. 5.061 (7) of the statutes is created to read:SB338,4,1245.061 (7) If the commission finds that a complaint received under sub. (1) has 5merit, the commission shall take corrective action to remedy the violation alleged in 6the complaint. The complainant may appeal to a court of competent jurisdiction 7any order issued under this section that dismisses the complaint or otherwise does 8not grant the relief requested in the complaint. The commission shall publish the 9results of all complaints dismissed made under this section on the website 10maintained by the commission and provide the same to the legislature and the 11standing committees with jurisdiction over elections in the manner provided under 12s. 13.172 (3).SB338,4,1313